Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.320

Declarations of candidacy—Positions as separate offices.

Candidates for the position of school director shall file their declarations of candidacy as provided in Title 29A RCW.

The positions of school directors in each district shall be dealt with as separate offices for all election purposes, and where more than one position is to be filled, each candidate shall file for one of the positions so designated: PROVIDED, That in school districts containing director districts, or a combination of director districts and director at large positions, candidates shall file for such director districts or at large positions. Position numbers shall be assigned to correspond to director district numbers to the extent possible.

[ 2015 c 53 s 11. Prior: 1990 c 161 s 4; 1990 c 59 s 98; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.314; prior: 1963 c 223 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.315.470, 28A.57.314, 28.58.082.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Commencement of terms of office: RCW 29A.04.330, 29A.60.270.

Nonpartisan primaries and elections: Chapter 29A.52 RCW.

School district elections

in counties with a population of less than two hundred ten thousand, times for holding: RCW 29A.04.330.

in counties with a population of two hundred ten thousand or more, times for holding: RCW 29A.04.330.

Terms of office: RCW 29A.04.330, 29A.60.270.